Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
GENERAL VIOLATIONS AND PROSECUTIONS

§281-101 Manufacture or sale without
license; penalty. If any person, acting in person or by or through any
agent, servant, or employee, manufactures or sells any liquor, either directly
or indirectly, or upon any pretense or by any subterfuge, except as authorized
pursuant to this chapter, the person shall be fined not more than $2,000 or
imprisoned not more than one year, or both. [L Sp 1933, c 40, §62; RL 1935,
§2630; RL 1945, §7282; RL 1955, §159-100; HRS §281-101; gen ch 1985; am L 1990,
c 171, §31]

Case Notes

Sale without a license. 37 H. 1.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next